trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic.aff
FLAG num
SFX 139 Y 24
SFX 139 0 th/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 thmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 thm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 thA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 thn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tkmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tkm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tkn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tny/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tnA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAh/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAhmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAhm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAhA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAhn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAkmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAkm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAkn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAny/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 139 0 tAnA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 539 Y 1
SFX 539 0 n/2,1017 . +IVSuff-n
SFX 432 Y 1
SFX 432 0 wn/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wn
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 tyn/2,1006 . +NSuff-tayn
SFX 348 Y 7
SFX 348 0 ynh/2,1034 . +IVSuff-ynh
SFX 348 0 ynhmA/2,1034 . +IVSuff-ynh
SFX 348 0 ynhm/2,1034 . +IVSuff-ynh
SFX 348 0 ynhA/2,1034 . +IVSuff-ynh
SFX 348 0 ynhn/2,1034 . +IVSuff-ynh
SFX 348 0 ynny/2,1034 . +IVSuff-ynh
SFX 348 0 ynnA/2,1034 . +IVSuff-ynh
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 n/2,1038 . +IVSuff-n
SFX 333 Y 5
SFX 333 0 h/2,1028 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 333 0 hmA/2,1028 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 333 0 hm/2,1028 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 333 0 hA/2,1028 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 333 0 hn/2,1028 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 376 Y 7
SFX 376 0 wh/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 376 0 whmA/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 376 0 whm/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 376 0 whA/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 376 0 whn/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 376 0 wny/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 376 0 wnA/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 0 0/2,1046 . +IVSuff-|
SFX 364 Y 7
SFX 364 0 wh/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 364 0 whmA/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 364 0 whm/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 364 0 whA/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 364 0 whn/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 364 0 wny/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 364 0 wnA/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awh
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 yn/2,1006 . +NSuff-ayn
SFX 377 Y 5
SFX 377 0 wk/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 377 0 wk/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 377 0 wkmA/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 377 0 wkm/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 377 0 wkn/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 370 Y 7
SFX 370 0 wh/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 370 0 whmA/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 370 0 whm/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 370 0 whA/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 370 0 whn/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 370 0 wny/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 370 0 wnA/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 365 Y 5
SFX 365 0 wk/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 365 0 wk/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 365 0 wkmA/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 365 0 wkm/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 365 0 wkn/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awk
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 wn/2,1037 . +IVSuff-awn
SFX 371 Y 5
SFX 371 0 wk/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 371 0 wk/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 371 0 wkmA/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 371 0 wkm/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 371 0 wkn/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 wn/2,1036 . +IVSuff-awn
SFX 445 Y 7
SFX 445 0 wnh/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 445 0 wnhmA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 445 0 wnhm/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 445 0 wnhA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 445 0 wnhn/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 445 0 wnny/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 445 0 wnnA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 372 Y 1
SFX 372 0 wn/2,1037 . +IVSuff-wn
SFX 587 Y 2
SFX 587 0 ny/2,1041 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 587 0 nA/2,1041 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 433 Y 7
SFX 433 0 wnh/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 433 0 wnhmA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 433 0 wnhm/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 433 0 wnhA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 433 0 wnhn/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 433 0 wnny/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 433 0 wnnA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnh
SFX 446 Y 5
SFX 446 0 wnk/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 446 0 wnk/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 446 0 wnkmA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 446 0 wnkm/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 446 0 wnkn/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 119 Y 13
SFX 119 0 tA/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAh/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAhmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAhm/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAhA/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAhn/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAk/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAk/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAkmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAkm/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAkn/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAy/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 119 0 tAnA/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAh
SFX 321 Y 5
SFX 321 0 h/2,1057 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 321 0 hmA/2,1057 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 321 0 hm/2,1057 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 321 0 hA/2,1057 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 321 0 hn/2,1057 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 434 Y 5
SFX 434 0 wnk/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 434 0 wnk/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 434 0 wnkmA/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 434 0 wnkm/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 434 0 wnkn/2,1014 . +IVSuff-wnk
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 p/2,1008 . +NSuff-ap
SFX 262 Y 12
SFX 262 0 th/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 thmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 thm/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 thA/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 thn/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 tk/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 tk/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 tkmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 tkm/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 tkn/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 ty/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 262 0 tnA/2,1003 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 322 Y 5
SFX 322 0 k/2,1057 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 322 0 k/2,1057 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 322 0 kmA/2,1057 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 322 0 km/2,1057 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 322 0 kn/2,1057 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 0 0/2,1008 . +Suff-0
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 tAn/2,1001 . +NSuff-atAn
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 0 0/2,1056 . +Suff-0
SFX 111 Y 12
SFX 111 0 |th/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |thmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |thm/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |thA/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |thn/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |tk/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |tk/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |tkmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |tkm/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |tkn/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |ty/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 111 0 |tnA/2,1001 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 At/2,1008 . +NSuff-At
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 wA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwA
SFX 451 Y 7
SFX 451 0 wnh/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 451 0 wnhmA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 451 0 wnhm/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 451 0 wnhA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 451 0 wnhn/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 451 0 wnny/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 451 0 wnnA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnh
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 0 wA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wA
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 0/2,1063 . +Suff-0
SFX 452 Y 5
SFX 452 0 wnk/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 452 0 wnk/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 452 0 wnkmA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 452 0 wnkm/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 452 0 wnkn/2,1015 . +IVSuff-awnk
SFX 411 Y 1
SFX 411 0 0/2,1045 . +IVSuff-|
SFX 543 Y 7
SFX 543 0 h/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 543 0 hmA/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 543 0 hm/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 543 0 hA/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 543 0 hn/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 543 0 ny/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 543 0 nA/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 537 Y 7
SFX 537 0 h/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 537 0 hmA/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 537 0 hm/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 537 0 hA/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 537 0 hn/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 537 0 ny/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 537 0 nA/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 343 Y 2
SFX 343 0 ny/2,1043 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 343 0 nA/2,1043 . +IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 0 y/2,1049 . +IVSuff-y
SFX 544 Y 5
SFX 544 0 k/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 544 0 k/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 544 0 kmA/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 544 0 km/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 544 0 kn/2,1017 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 538 Y 5
SFX 538 0 k/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 538 0 k/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 538 0 kmA/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 538 0 km/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 538 0 kn/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 532 Y 7
SFX 532 0 h/2,1021 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 532 0 hmA/2,1021 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 532 0 hm/2,1021 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 532 0 hA/2,1021 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 532 0 hn/2,1021 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 532 0 ny/2,1021 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 532 0 nA/2,1021 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 57 Y 22
SFX 57 0 h/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 hmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 hm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 hA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 hn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 k/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 k/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 kmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 km/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 kn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 ny/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 nA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 Ah/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 AhmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 Ahm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 AhA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 Ahn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 Ak/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 Ak/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 AkmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 Akm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 57 0 Akn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-~nh
SFX 555 Y 7
SFX 555 0 h/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 555 0 hmA/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 555 0 hm/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 555 0 hA/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 555 0 hn/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 555 0 ny/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 555 0 nA/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 549 Y 7
SFX 549 0 h/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 549 0 hmA/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 549 0 hm/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 549 0 hA/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 549 0 hn/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 549 0 ny/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 549 0 nA/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nh
SFX 556 Y 5
SFX 556 0 k/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 556 0 k/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 556 0 kmA/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 556 0 km/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 556 0 kn/2,1025 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 550 Y 5
SFX 550 0 k/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 550 0 k/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 550 0 kmA/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 550 0 km/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 550 0 kn/2,1024 . +IVSuff-~nk
SFX 63 Y 12
SFX 63 0 wh/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 whmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 whm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 whA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 whn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 wk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 wk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 wkmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 wkm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 wkn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 wny/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 63 0 wnA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 572 Y 1
SFX 572 0 0/2,1019 . +Suff-0
SFX 239 Y 12
SFX 239 0 |th/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |thmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |thm/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |thA/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |thn/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |tk/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |tk/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |tkmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |tkm/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |tkn/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |ty/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 239 0 |tnA/2,1004 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 442 Y 7
SFX 442 0 wh/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 442 0 whmA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 442 0 whm/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 442 0 whA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 442 0 whn/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 442 0 wny/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 442 0 wnA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 221 Y 12
SFX 221 0 th/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 thmA/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 thm/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 thA/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 thn/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 tk/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 tk/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 tkmA/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 tkm/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 tkn/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 ty/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 221 0 tnA/2,1002 . +NSuff-ath
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 p/2,1007 . +NSuff-ap
SFX 569 Y 5
SFX 569 0 h/2,1019 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 569 0 hmA/2,1019 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 569 0 hm/2,1019 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 569 0 hA/2,1019 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 569 0 hn/2,1019 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 443 Y 5
SFX 443 0 wk/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 443 0 wk/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 443 0 wkmA/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 443 0 wkm/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wk
SFX 443 0 wkn/2,1015 . +IVSuff-wk
